Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CENTER FOR COMMUNICATION AND DEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Center for Communication and Development, also known as KMOJ FM, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to acquire property for and to design, construct, furnish, and equip the KMOJ Community Media and Engagement Hub in the city of Minneapolis. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end